Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Regulatory Flexibility Act of 2007

4-5-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Regulatory Flexibility Act of 2007.”

Acts 2007, ch. 464, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-402. Analysis of impact on small business.

Prior to initiating the rulemaking process as described in §§ 4-5-202(a)(2) and 4-5-203(a), all agencies shall conduct a review of whether a proposed rule or rule affects small businesses.

Each agency shall, after June 21, 2007, employ a regulatory flexibility analysis utilizing regulatory methods that accomplish the objectives of applicable statutes while minimizing any adverse impact on small business. The agency shall consider, but not be limited to, each of the following methods of reducing the impact of the proposed rule on small businesses while remaining consistent with health, safety, and well-being:

The extent to which the rule may overlap, duplicate, or conflict with other federal, state, and local governmental rules;

Clarity, conciseness, and lack of ambiguity in the rule;

The establishment of flexible compliance and reporting requirements for small businesses;

The establishment of friendly schedules or deadlines for compliance and reporting requirements for small businesses;

The consolidation or simplification of compliance or reporting requirements for small businesses;

The establishment of performance standards for small businesses as opposed to design or operational standards required in the proposed rule; and

The unnecessary creation of entry barriers or other effects that stifle entrepreneurial activity, curb innovation, or increase costs.

Acts 2007, ch. 464, § 4; 2009, ch. 566, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-403. Preparation of economic impact statement.

As part of the rulemaking process for any proposed rule that may have an impact on small businesses, each agency shall prepare an economic impact statement as an addendum for each rule that is deemed to affect small businesses, which shall be published in the Tennessee administrative register, filed with the secretary of state and made available to all interested parties, including the secretary of state, attorney general and reporter and the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and as described for rules in part 2 of this chapter. The secretary of state may require the online submission of economic impact statements filed pursuant to this part. The statement shall include the following:

The type or types of small business and an identification and estimate of the number of small businesses subject to the proposed rule that would bear the cost of, or directly benefit from the proposed rule;

The projected reporting, recordkeeping and other administrative costs required for compliance with the proposed rule, including the type of professional skills necessary for preparation of the report or record;

A statement of the probable effect on impacted small businesses and consumers;

A description of any less burdensome, less intrusive or less costly alternative methods of achieving the purpose and objectives of the proposed rule that may exist, and to what extent the alternative means might be less burdensome to small business;

A comparison of the proposed rule with any federal or state counterparts; and

Analysis of the effect of the possible exemption of small businesses from all or any part of the requirements contained in the proposed rule.

Acts 2007, ch. 464, § 5; 2016, ch. 576, § 8.

4-5-404. Application.

This part shall not apply to rules that are adopted on an emergency basis under part 2 of this chapter, that are federally mandated, or that substantially codify existing state or federal law.

Acts 2007, ch. 464, § 6; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.